Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-164.02
Formation of business partnership
or limited liability company; not prohibited.

Nothing in
the Public Accountancy Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
under the act shall be construed to prohibit a person holding a certificate as a certified public accountant from forming
a business partnership or limited liability company with a person not holding
a certificate or permit.

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 59;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 57;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 36.